test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-celt_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - celt: # Verb 'eng bring/fin tuoda' - _STUMT_ full paradigm /http://ezis.ailab.lv:8182/inflect/json/en/celt/
     celt+V+TV+Inf: celt
     celt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Fut+Sg1: celšu
     celt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Fut+Sg2: celsi
     celt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Fut+Pl1: celsim
     celt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Fut+Pl2: celsiet
     celt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Fut+SP3: cels

     celt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Prs+Sg1: ceļu
     celt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Prs+Sg2: ceļ
     celt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Prs+Pl1: ceļam
     celt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Prs+Pl2: ceļat
     celt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Prs+SP3: ceļ

     celt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Prt+Sg1: cēlu
     celt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Prt+Sg2: cēli
     celt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Prt+Pl1: cēlām
     celt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Prt+Pl2: cēlāt
     celt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Prt+SP3: cēla

     celt+V+TV+Deb+Prs: jāceļ
     celt+V+TV+Quo+Prs: ceļot
     celt+V+TV+Quo+Fut: celšot
     celt+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: cel
     celt+V+TV+Imprt+Pl2: celiet

     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: ceļošs
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: ceļoša
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: ceļošam
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: ceļošu
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef: ceļošā
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: ceļoši
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: ceļošu
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: ceļošiem
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: ceļošus
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef: ceļošos
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: ceļošais
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: ceļošā
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: ceļošajam
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: ceļošo
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: ceļošajā
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: [ceļošais, ceļošo]
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: ceļošie
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: ceļošo
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: ceļošajiem
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: ceļošos
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: ceļošajos
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: ceļošie
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: ceļoša
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: ceļošas
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: ceļošai
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: ceļošu
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef: ceļošā
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: ceļošas
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: ceļošu
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: ceļošām
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: ceļošas
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef: ceļošās
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: ceļošā
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: ceļošās
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: ceļošajai
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: ceļošo
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: ceļošajā
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: ceļošā
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: ceļošās
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: ceļošo
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: ceļošajām
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: ceļošās
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: ceļošajās
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: ceļošās

     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: cēlis
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: cēluša
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: cēlušam
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: cēlušu
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef: cēlušā
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: cēluši
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: cēlušu
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: cēlušiem
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: cēlušus
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef: cēlušos
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: cēlušais
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: cēlušā
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: cēlušajam
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: cēlušo
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: cēlušajā
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: cēlušais
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: cēlušie
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: cēlušo
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: cēlušajiem
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: cēlušos
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: cēlušajos
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: cēlušie
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: cēlusi
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: cēlušas
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: cēlušai
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: cēlušu
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef: cēlušā
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: cēlušas
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: cēlušu
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: cēlušām
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: cēlušas
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef: cēlušās
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: cēlusī
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: cēlušās
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: cēlušajai
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: cēlušo
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: cēlušajā
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: cēlusī
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: cēlušās
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: cēlušo
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: cēlušajām
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: cēlušās
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: cēlušajās
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: cēlušās

     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: ceļams
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: ceļama
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: ceļamam
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: ceļamu
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef: ceļamā
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: ceļami
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: ceļamu
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: ceļamiem
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: ceļamus
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef: ceļamos
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: ceļamais
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: ceļamā
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: ceļamajam
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: ceļamo
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: ceļamajā
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: [ceļamais, ceļamo]
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: ceļamie
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: ceļamo
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: ceļamajiem
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: ceļamos
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: ceļamajos
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: ceļamie
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: ceļama
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: ceļamas
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: ceļamai
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: ceļamu
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef: ceļamā
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: ceļamas
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: ceļamu
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: ceļamām
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: ceļamas
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef: ceļamās
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: ceļamā
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: ceļamās
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: ceļamajai
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: ceļamo
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: ceļamajā
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: ceļamā
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: ceļamās
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: ceļamo
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: ceļamajām
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: ceļamās
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: ceļamajās
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: ceļamās

     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: celts
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: celta
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: celtam
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: celtu
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef: celtā
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: celti
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: celtu
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: celtiem
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: celtus
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef: celtos
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: celtais
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: celtā
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: celtajam
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: celto
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: celtajā
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: celtais
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: celtie
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: celto
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: celtajiem
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: celtos
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: celtajos
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: celtie
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: celta
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: celtas
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: celtai
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: celtu
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef: celtā
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: celtas
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: celtu
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: celtām
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: celtas
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef: celtās
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: celtā
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: celtās
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: celtajai
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: celto
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: celtajā
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: celtā
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: celtās
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: celto
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: celtajām
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: celtās
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: celtajās
     celt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: celtās
#"Declension":"4"
     celt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: celšana
     celt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: celšanas
     celt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: celšanai
     celt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Acc: celšanu
     celt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Loc: celšanā
     celt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Voc: celšana
     celt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: celšanas
     celt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: celšanu
     celt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: celšanām
     celt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Acc: celšanas
     celt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Loc: celšanās
     celt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Voc: celšanas
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: cēldams
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: cēldama
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: cēldami
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: cēldamas

#     celt+V+TV+Der/Adv+Adv+Pos: rokoši


     celt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: cēliens
     celt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: cēliena
     celt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: cēlienam
     celt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Acc: cēlienu
     celt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Loc: cēlienā
     celt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Voc: [cēliens, cēlien]
     celt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: cēlieni
     celt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: cēlienu
     celt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: cēlieniem
     celt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Acc: cēlienus
     celt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Loc: cēlienos
     celt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Voc: cēlieni

     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2: ceļot
     celt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Pred2: ceļam
     celt+V+TV+Cond: celtu
     celt+V+TV+Deb+Quo: jāceļot
